Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2331
Act, how cited.

Sections 23-2301 to 23-2332.01 shall be known and may be cited as the County Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 31, p. 411;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 833, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 501, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 7;

Laws 1997, LB 250, § 8;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 6;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 8;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 33;

Laws 1999, LB 687, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 37;

Laws 2001, LB 186, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 17.